test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-perfect_gt-norm.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:

  NORM ANA recognizes only those without +Err/-Norm:
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing: acárie
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing: ~cárie
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Plur: acárier
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Plur: ~cárier
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Sing+1: [acárien, acárienye]
    car-+V+Past+Perf+Err/-Norm+Sing+1: [~cárien, ~cárienye]
